North Dakota, session 69, HB1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-10-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-10-02. Number and election of county officers.
1. Each organized county, unless it has adopted one of the optional forms of county
government provided by the code or has combined or separated the functions of
county offices or redesignated offices as elective or appointive pursuant tounder
chapter 11-10.2 or 11-10.3, must have the following officers:
1. a. One county auditor.
2. b. One recorder.
3. c. One county treasurer.
4. d. One coroner.
5. e. A board of county commissioners consisting of three or five members as provided
in this title.
2. Notwithstanding chapter 11 - 10.2 or 11 - 10.3, if the county auditor as provided for in
subsection 1 is a ful l - time employee of the county, the county auditor must be an
elective office. A county may not exercise any power under a home rule charter to
circumvent this subsection.
3. In addition, unless otherwise provided in section 11-10-02.3, each county must have
an elected state's attorney and an elected sheriff.
4. In counties having a population of six thousand or less, the recorder also serves as ex
officio clerk of the district court. The required officers must be chosen by the qualified
Page No. 1 25.1062.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
electors of the respective counties at the general election in each even-numbered
year, except the recorder, county auditor, treasurer, sheriff, and state's attorney, who
must be chosen in 1966 and every four years thereafter, the members of the board of
county commissioners, who must be chosen in the manner prescribed in section
11-11-02, and the county coroner, who must be chosen in the manner prescribed in
section 11-19.1-03.
Page No. 2 25.1062.02000